src/fst/test/old-gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-wicihew_gt-norm.yaml
## INDEPENDENT ##
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1SgO:    kika-wîcihin # LOCAL DIR
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1PlO:    kika-wîcihinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1PlO:    kika-wîcihinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1SgO:    kika-wîcihinâwâw

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+2SgO:    kika-wîcihitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+2SgO:    kika-wîcihitinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+2PlO:    kika-wîcihitinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+2PlO:    kika-wîcihitinâwâw
